Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1308.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Marine Corps SSGT Michael A. Geneva Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) Michael Anthony Geneva was born January 14, 1947, and raised in Clymer Borough, Indiana County.(2) Mr. Geneva joined the United States Marine Corps in November 1966 and was honorably discharged in March 1970.(3) During the Vietnam campaign, Mr. Geneva received the National Defense Service Medal, Vietnam Service Medal with Bronze Star, Vietnam Campaign Medal with Device, Rifle Marksmanship Badge and Good Conduct Medal.(4) Michael A. Geneva passed away November 18, 1994.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 19080, carrying Pennsylvania Route 259 over Laurel Run in 12345678910111213141516171819 Cherryhill Township, Indiana County, is designated the Marine Corps SSGT Michael A. Geneva Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1308PN1662 - 2 - 1234567